Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.520

Activities not constituting doing business.

(1) Activities of a foreign entity that do not constitute doing business in this state under this chapter include, but are not limited to:

(a) Maintaining, defending, mediating, arbitrating, or settling an action or proceeding, or settling claims or disputes;

(b) Carrying on any activity concerning its internal affairs, including holding meetings of its interest holders or governors;

(c) Maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

(d) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of securities of the entity or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

(e) Selling through independent contractors;

(f) Soliciting or obtaining orders by any means if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become binding contracts and where the contracts do not involve any local performance other than delivery and installation;

(g) Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or security interests in property;

(h) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages or security interests in property securing the debts;

(i) Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and that is not in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

(j) Owning, without more, property;

(k) Doing business in interstate commerce; and

(l) Operating an approved branch campus of a foreign degree-granting institution in compliance with chapter 28B.90 RCW and in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

(2) In addition to those acts that are specified in subsection (1) of this section, a foreign degree-granting institution that establishes an approved branch campus in the state under chapter 28B.90 RCW shall not be deemed to transact business in the state solely because it:

(a) Owns and controls an incorporated branch campus in this state;

(b) Pays the expenses of tuition or room and board charged by the incorporated branch campus for its students enrolled at the branch campus or contributes to the capital thereof; or

(c) Provides personnel who furnish assistance and counsel to its students while in the state but who have no authority to enter into any transactions for or on behalf of the foreign degree-granting institution.

(3) A person does not do business in this state solely by being an interest holder or governor of a domestic entity or foreign entity that does business in this state.

(4) This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign entity to service of process, taxation, or regulation under law of this state other than this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1505.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.